cs: Smyslový účinek: Chladivý; Neutrální; Žádný; Brnění; Zahřívání; Jiné
en: Sensory effect: Cooling; Neutral; None; Tingling; Warming; Other
lt-LT: Jutiminis poveikis: Vėsinamasis; Neutralus; Nėra; Dilgčiojimas; Šildantis; Kita
tr: Duyusal etki: Soğutucu; Nötr; Hiçbiri; Karıncalanma hissi; Isıtma; Diğer
el: Αισθητηριακό αποτέλεσμα: Ψύξη; Ουδέτερο; Καμία; Μυρμήγκιασμα; Θέρμανση; Άλλο
ja: 感覚的効果: クーリング; ニュートラル; なし; ピリピリ感; 温める; その他
ro-RO: Efect senzorial: Răcoritor; Neutru; Niciuna; Furnicături; Încălzire; Altele
ko: 감각 효과: 쿨링; 중성색; 없음; 따끔거림; 데우기; 기타
pt-PT: Efeito sensorial: Arrefecimento; Neutro; Nenhum; Formigueiro; Aquecimento; Outro
zh-CN: 感官效果: 冷却; 中性色; 无; 刺痛感; 温热; 其他
zh-TW: 感官效果: 冰鎮; 中性; 無; 刺激感; 溫熱感; 其他
es: Efecto sensorial: Refrescante; Neutro; Ninguno; Hormigueo; Calentamiento; Otros
fi: Aistinvarainen vaikutus: Viilennys; Neutraali; Ei mitään; Kihelmöivä; Lämpeneminen; Muu
nb: Sensorisk effekt: Avkjøling; Nøytral; Ingen; Prikking; Oppvarming; Annet
it: Effetto sensoriale: Raffreddante; Neutro; Nessuna; Formicolio; Riscaldante; Altro
hu: Érzékszervi hatás: Hűtő; Semleges; Egyik sem; Bizsergető; Melegítő; Egyéb
da: Sensorisk effekt: Kølende; Neutral; Ingen; Prikkende; Varmende; Andet
nl: Zintuiglijk effect: Koeling; Neutraal; Geen; Tintelend; Verwarmend; Andere
sv: Sensorisk effekt: Kylning; Neutral; Inga; Pirrande; Värmande; Övrigt
pl: Efekt sensoryczny: Chłodzenie; Neutralne; Brak; Mrowienie; Nagrzewanie; Inne
vi: Hiệu ứng cảm giác: Làm mát; Màu trung tính; Không có; Châm chích; Làm ấm; Khác
th: ผลทางประสาทสัมผัส: ระบายความร้อน; สีโทนกลาง; ไม่มี; รู้สึกเสียวซ่า; ให้ความรู้สึกที่อบอุ่น; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Сензорен ефект: Охлаждане; Неутрален; Няма; Изтръпващ; Затоплящ; Други
fr: Effet sensoriel: Rafraîchissant; Neutre; Aucune; Picotement; Chauffant; Autre
ru: Сенсорный эффект: Охлаждение; Нейтральный; Нет; Покалывающий; Согревающий; Другой
pt-BR: Efeito sensorial: Refrescante; Neutra; Nenhum; Formigamento; Aquecimento; Outro
hr-HR: Senzorni učinak: Hlađenje; Neutralno; Nema; Trnci; Zagrijavanje; Ostalo
sl-SI: Senzorični učinek: Hlajenje; Nevtralno; Brez; Mravljinčenje; Ogrevanje; Drugo
de: Sensorischer Effekt: Kühlung; Neutral; Keine; Prickelnd; Wärmend; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Zmyslový účinok: Chladenie; Neutrálny; Žiadny; Mravčivý; Otepľovanie; Iné